Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.211

Amendment or restatement of certificate of limited partnership.

(1) In order to amend its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment or, pursuant to article 11 of this chapter, articles of merger stating:

(a) The name of the limited partnership;

(b) The date of filing of its initial certificate of limited partnership; and

(c) The changes the amendment makes to the certificate of limited partnership as most recently amended or restated.

(2) A limited partnership shall promptly deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership to reflect:

(a) The admission of a new general partner;

(b) The dissociation of a person as a general partner; or

(c) The appointment of a person to wind up the limited partnership's activities under RCW 25.10.581 (3) or (4).

(3) A general partner that knows that any information in a filed certificate of limited partnership was false when the certificate was filed or has become false due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

(a) Cause the certificate of limited partnership to be amended; or

(b) If appropriate, deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change pursuant to RCW 23.95.430 or a statement of correction pursuant to RCW 23.95.220.

(4) A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose as determined by the limited partnership.

(5) A restated certificate of limited partnership may be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in the same manner as an amendment.

(6) An amendment or restated certificate of limited partnership is effective when filed by the secretary of state as provided in RCW 23.95.210, and may state a delayed effective date in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6109; 2009 c 188 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.